Utah statutes.
78B-6-304.   Bail.

Whenever a warrant of attachment is issued pursuant to this chapter, the court or judge must direct, by an indorsement on the warrant, that the person charged may be allowed to post bail for the person's appearance, in an amount to be prescribed in the indorsement.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

